Hawaii, session 2026, SB990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 706, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§706-    Sentencing of imprisonment for sexual assault.  Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 706 to the contrary, a person convicted of an offense under section 707-730, 707-731, 707-732, 707-733, or 707-733.6 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment without possibility of parole or probation as follows: (1)  For sexual assault in the first degree under section 707-730,     years; (2)  For sexual assault in the second degree under section 707-731,     years; (3)  For sexual assault in the third degree under section 707-732,      year; (4)  For sexual assault in the fourth degree under section 707-733,     months; and (5)  For continuous sexual assault of a minor under the age of fourteen years under section 707‑733.6,     years." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________